src-fst-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
# Verb inflection in Vepsian

## Lexica from the *stems* file

### Irregular verbs
V_EI all forms of the *ei* verb

### Regular verbs

V_SUGIDA This and all V_... lexica redirect to *V-VowelStem, V-ConsonantStem, INDPRS3* (see below)

V_OLDA (adding :le to vowstem)


V_PESTA (adding -e) ti vowstem and indprs3)

V_TEHTA = tehta:te (adding :ge to vowst and indprs3)

V_SIRTA =  sirta:sir

V_JOKSTA = joksta:joks

V_LETA = leta:le

V_JODA = joda:jo

V_VEDADA =  vedada:ved

V_MAKSTA = maksta:maks

V_ASTTA = astta:ast

V_HUBETA = hubeta:hube

V_TULDA = tulda:tul

V_OTTA = otta:ot

V_HOMAITA =  homaita:homai

V_OIGETA

V_VIRIGATA =  virigata:viriga

V_KERATA = kerata:kera

V_JAGADA =  jagada:jag (adding a to prt and a elsewhere)


V_TUGETA = tugeta:tuge

V_VALITA  =  valita:vali

V_AVAITA = avaita:avai, avaidab avaiži


### Default lexicon

V_ default verb lexicon

## The three contlex types

### PNDPRS3

INDPRS3 for Sg3 and Pl3



### Vowel stems

V-VowelStem



V-VowelStem-PRS This lexicon gives all  forms for vowel stems

#### Present Morphology


#### IMPERATIVE 


#### present reflexive



#### Preterite 





#### conditional present 



#### Imperfect Reflexive 


#### Conditional Present Reflexive




### Consonant Stems

V-ConsonantStem V-ConsonantStem_OTHER ;

V-ConsonantStem_OTHER 

#### Imperative 


#### Conditional Imperfect 


#### Reflexive 


#### Imperative 


V-ConsonantStem_t 



* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-vep/blob/main/../src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc)</small>
